Massachusetts, session 194th, S1408.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 1 of Chapter 123 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting the following definition:-
“Forensic Unit”, a physically separate unit from other units. These units shall have in
place restrictions consistent with those present when an individual is incarcerated. These units
shall include appropriate staffing levels to address the needs of the patient population and who
have undergone specialized training to work effectively with this patient population. The
physical environment of the unit shall be conducive to meeting the needs of the patient
population.
of 2

SECTION 2. Section 15 of said Chapter 123, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
adding the following paragraph:-
(g) any individual admitted to a facility under the conditions described in paragraph (b) or
paragraph (e) shall be initially admitted to a forensic unit.
SECTION 3. Section 16 of said Chapter 123, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
adding the following paragraph:-
(g) any individual admitted to a facility under the conditions described in paragraph (a),
(c) or paragraph (e) shall be initially admitted to a forensic unit.
SECTION 4. Section 18 of said Chapter 123, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
adding the following paragraph:-
(e) any individual admitted to a facility under the conditions described in paragraph (a) or
paragraph (b) shall be initially admitted to a forensic unit.
of 2